Hawaii, session 2025, GM1221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 586-4z Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows:
"(e) When a temporary restraining order is granted and the
respondent or person to be restrained knows of the order, a
knowing or intentional violation of the restraining order [is]
shall be a misdemeanor. A person convicted under this section
shall be ordered by the court to complete an assessment at any
available domestic violence program and shall complete a
domestic violence intervention or anger management course as
determined by the domestic violence program. The court
additionally shall sentence a person convicted under this
section as follows:
(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) , for a first
conviction for a violation of the temporary
restraining order, the person shall serve a mandatory
minimum jail sentence of [forty-eight houro] five days
2025-2890 SB295 HD2 HMSO 1
■liHllillHIMIII

Page 2 S.B. NO. -1
and be fined no less than $300 nor more than
$500;
(2) For a first conviction for a violation of the
temporary restraining order, if the person has a prior
conviction for any of the following felonies:
(A) Section 707-701 relating to murder in the first
degree;
(B) Section 707-701.5 relating to murder in the
second degree;
(C) Section 707-710 relating to assault in the first
degree;
(D) Section 707-711 relating to assault in the second
degree;
(E) Section 707-720 relating to kidnapping;
(F) Section 707-721 relating to unlawful imprisonment
in the first degree;
(G) Section 707-730 relating to sexual assault in the
first degree;
(H) Section 707-731 relating to sexual assault in the
second degree;
2025-2890 SB295 HD2 HMSO 2

Page 3
S.B. NO. -1
(I) Section 707-732 relating to sexual assault in the
third degree;
(J) Section 707-733.6 relating to continuous sexual
assault of a minor under the age of fourteen
years;
(K) Section 707-750 relating to promoting child abuse
in the first degree;
(L) Section 708-810 relating to burglary in the first
degree;
(M) Section 708-811 relating to burglary in the
second degree;
(N) Section 709-906 relating to abuse of family or
household members; or
(0) Section 711-1106.4 relating to aggravated
harassment by stalking;
and if any of these offenses has been committed
against a family or household member as defined in
section 586-1, the person shall serve a mandatory
minimum term of imprisonment of thirty days
and be fined no less than [$150] $350 nor more than
$600; and
2025-2890 SB295 HD2 HMSO 3
■unHiHiiniiiin

Page 4 295
S.B. NO
S.D. 1
H.D.2
(3) For the second and any subsequent conviction for a
violation of the temporary restraining order, the
person shall serve a mandatory minimum jail sentence
of [thirsty] forty-five days and be fined no less than
$500 nor more than $1,000;
provided that the court shall not sentence a defendant to pay a
fine [unle&&] if the court makes an on-the-record determination
that the defendant is or will be [able] unable to pay the fine.
Upon conviction and sentencing of the defendant, the court
shall order that the defendant immediately be incarcerated to
serve the mandatory minimum sentence imposed; provided that the
defendant may be admitted to bail pending appeal pursuant to
chapter 804. The court may stay the imposition of the sentence
if special circumstances exist.
The court may suspend any jail sentence, except for the
mandatory sentences under paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) upon
condition that the defendant remain alcohol- and drug-free,
conviction-free, [ea?] ar^ complete court-ordered assessments or
intervention. Nothing in this section shall be construed as
limiting the discretion of the judge to impose additional
sanctions authorized in sentencing for a misdemeanor."
2025-2890 SB295 HD2 HMSO

Page 5
S.B. NO. ^.1
H.D.2
SECTION 2. Section 586-11, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) Whenever an order for protection is granted pursuant
to this chapter, a respondent or person to be restrained who
knowingly or intentionally violates the order for protection
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. • A person convicted under this
section shall be ordered by the court to complete an assessment
at any available domestic violence program and shall complete a
domestic violence intervention or anger management course as
determined by the domestic violence program. The court
additionally shall sentence a person convicted under this
section as follows:
(1) For a first conviction for violation of the order for
protection [•*•
4A)- -That • i-o in the--naturo' of— non-domcotio abuse,—fefee
person may bo—sefitoncod to a jail sent-enee of
fined—

-That is--in the--Raturc of domostio abuse] , the
person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum
jail sentence of no less than [forty-eight hours]
2025-2890 SB295 HD2 HMSO 5
loiiioioiiniiininiiii

Page 6
S.B. NO.
-1
H.D. 2
five days and be fined no less than $300
nor more than $500;
provided that any conviction for violation of a
temporary restraining order under section 586-4 (e),
issued under the same judicial case number as the
order for protection, shall be treated as a prior
violation of an order for protection; and
(2) For [a-] the second and any subsequent conviction for
violation of the order for protection [-^
-(A)- That- io in the nature of non-domcstic abuse,—and
occurs after a firot-convietien-for violation of
eaffte—©i^de^-^fedet—wes-drH—the—
demestie—afease-7—the person shall be-sen-tcnced- to
a mandatory -minimum'jail sentence of-no less than
forty-eight hours and bo fined no more than $250;
-(fr)- That-drs—ift—the—of—domestie—afeaeeT—and]
that occurs after a first conviction for
violation of the same order [that was in the
nature of domestic abuo-cr] or conviction for a
yiolat ion of the tam£orar3r^^st^aim3jT2 ord^
under section 586-4 (e), issued under the same
2025-2890 SB295 HD2 HMSO
IDillinilllliHIIHIIII

Page 7 S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
judicial case number as the order for protection,
the person shall be sentenced to a mandatory
minimum jail sentence of no less than
forty-five days and be fined no less than [-$^5^]
$500 nor more than $1,000;
[-(€}- That is in the nature of non-domcotio abuoo/—aftd
occurs—after a first conviction for violation of
the same—or-de-r^^-h-at—was - ■■in^he-nat-u-r-c of—domestic
afeuoe-T—the person shall be-scntcnecd'-teo—a
ma-Rda-tor-y-m-inimum- ja-i-l—■sentence of no loss than
forty-eight ho-u-r-s—and be fined no more—than—$250;

4-B)- is—in-^fede—Hafua?e—ef—demesfire—afeo&e-T—and
occurs■■a-fteor- a first conviction-for violation of
the same ■■order that is—in—the nature--©f—non-
domcotio abuse-/—fehe-pereen- -sha-l-l—be- senfeneed to
a mandatory minimum jail oontonco of no less -than
forty-cight-"hours and-be f-ined-no more than $150,'-

-(-3}- For any subsequent vi-e-l-ation -that- -ocours after a
second oonviction for violation-of the same order for
2025-2890 SB295 HD2 HMSO

Page 8
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
protGGtion,—thG pGroon ohall bG DcntGnoGd to q
mandatory minimum jail aontonoG of not Igso t-han
thirty days and be—finod not loos than $250 nor moro
tban -$1,000; ]
provided that the court shall not sentence a defendant to pay a
fine [eniee©] if the court makes an on-the-record determination
that the defendant is or will be [ebie] unable to pay the fine.
Upon conviction and sentencing of the defendant, the court
shall order that the defendant immediately be incarcerated to
serve the mandatory minimum sentence imposed; provided that the
defendant may be admitted to bail pending appeal pursuant to
chapter 804. The court may stay the imposition of the sentence
if special circumstances exist.
The court may suspend any jail sentence under
[subparagraphs—(1) (A)—and—(2) (C),] paragraphs (1) and (2), upon
condition that the defendant remain alcohol- and drug-free,
conviction-free, [en] ai^ complete court-ordered assessments or
intervention. Nothing in this section shall be construed as
limiting the discretion of the judge to impose additional
sanctions authorized in sentencing for a misdemeanor offense.
2025-2890 SB295 HD2 HMSO

Page 9
S.B. NO. Bl
All remedies for the enforcement of judgments shall apply to
this chapter."
SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2890 SB295 HD2 HMSO 9
iniMilHIiWIHIII

S.B. NO. S ;
APPROVED this 29th day of May . 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI I

S.B.No. 295, S.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 16, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 295, SD 1,HD2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE
STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 2, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives